Utah statutes.
20A-3-413 (Superseded 01/01/12).   Report on absentee ballots.

(1)  Not later than 60 days after each regular general election, each county clerk shall submit a report to the lieutenant governor indicating:

(a)  the number of ballots sent to military and overseas citizen voters; and

(b)  the number of ballots returned by military and overseas citizen voters that were counted.

(2)  Not later than 90 days after each regular general election, the lieutenant governor shall submit a statewide report to the Election Assistance Commission that includes the information required by Subsection (1).

